pl: Typ wędzarki: Beczka; Typ szafkowy / skrzyniowy; Bęben; Elektryczne; Kamado; Offsetowe; Grill / wędzarnia na pellet; Na propan; Pionowe; Typ wodny / bullet; Inne
pt-BR: Tipo de defumador: Barril; Armário/caixa; Tambor; Elétrica; Kamado; Desvio; Churrasqueira/defumador a pellets; Propano; Vertical; Água/Bullet; Outro
sk-SK: Typ udiarne: Sud; Skrinka/box; Bubon; Elektrický; Kamado; Vysadený; Peletový gril/údiareň; Propánový; Vertikálny; Vodná/valcovitá; Iné
de: Rauchertyp: Fass; Schrank/Box; Trommel; Elektrisch; Kamado; Mit Versatz; Pelletgrill/Smoker; Propan; Vertikal; Wasser/Tonne; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Tipul afumătorii: Butoi; Dulap/cutie; Tambur; Electric; Kamado; Offset; Grătar/afumător cu pelete; Propan; Vertical; Apă/glonț; Altele
it: Tipo di affumicatore: Barile; Armadio/scatola; Tamburo; Elettrico; Kamado; Offset; Griglia/affumicatore a pellet; Propano; Verticale; Ad acqua/Bullet; Altro
sl-SI: Vrsta aparata za dimljenje: Odebeljena; Omarica/škatla; Bobenska; Električna; Kamado; Dvignjena lopatica; Peletni žar/dimnik; Propan; Navpična; Voda/Bullet; Drug
da: Rygeovnstype: Tønde; Skab/kasse; Tromme; Elektrisk; Kamado; Offset; Pillegrill/-ryger; Propan; Lodret; Vand/bullet; Andet
ru: Тип коптильни: Бочка; Шкаф/ящик; Барабан; Электрическая; Камадо; Офсетная; Пеллетный гриль/коптильня; Газовая (пропановая); Вертикальная; Вода/Bullet; Другая
tr: Tütsüleyici tipi: Fıçı; Dolap/kutu; Varil; Elektrikli; Kamado; Yan ocaklı; Peletli ızgara/tütsüleme cihazı; Propan; Dikey; Su tipi (bullet); Diğer
hu: Füstölő típusa: Cső; Szekrény/doboz; Dob; Elektromos; Kamado; Ferde; Pellet grillsütő/füstölő; Propán; Függőleges; Vizes/golyós; Egyéb
fi: Tupakoitsijan tyyppi: Tynnyri; Kaappi/laatikko; Rumpu; Sähkö; Kamado; Offset; Pellettigrilli/-savustin; Propaani; Pystysuora; Vesi-/pystysavustin; Muu
cs: Typ udírny: Barel; Skříň/box; Sud; Elektrické; Keramické (Kamado); Offset (oddělená spalovací komora); Peletový gril /udírna; Propan; Vertikální; Vodní udírna; Jiné
hr-HR: Vrsta dimnika: Bačvasti; Ormarić/kutija; Bubanj; Električna; Kamado; Offset; Roštilj/pušnica na pelete; Propan; Vertikalno; Voda/bullet; Ostalo
en: Smoker type: Barrel; Cabinet/box; Drum; Electric; Kamado; Offset; Pellet grill/smoker; Propane; Vertical; Water/bullet; Other
zh-TW: 煙燻爐類型: 桶形; 櫃式/箱式; 鼓形; 電動式; Kamado 烤架; 德州烤肉爐; 顆粒烤爐/煙燻爐; 丙烷; 垂直; 水/子彈形; 其他
el: Τύπος καπνιστηριού: Βαρέλι; Ντουλάπι/κουτί; Drum; Ηλεκτρικό; Kamado; Offset; Ψησταριά/καπνιστήριο πέλλετ; Υγραερίου; Κάθετο; Νερό/Bullet; Άλλο
sv: Typ av rökugn: Tunna; Skåp/låda; Trumma; Elektrisk; Kamado; Offset; Pelletgrill/rökugn; Propan; Vertikal; Vatten/Bullet; Annat
es: Tipo de ahumador: Barril; Gabinete/caja; Tambor; Eléctrico; Kamado; Desplazado; Parrilla/ahumador de pellets; Propano; Vertical; Agua/Carbón; Otros
nl: Rookoventype: Vat; Kastmodel; Drum; Elektrisch; Kamado; Offset; Pelletgrill/rookoven; Propaan; Verticaal; Waterroker/Bullet smoker; Overig
fr: Type de fumoir: Tonneau; Armoire/coffre; Tambour; Électrique; Kamado; Offset; Fumoir/barbecue à pellets; Propane; Vertical; Eau/Bullet; Autre
vi: Loại máy xông khói: Thùng; Tủ/hộp; Trống; Điện; Kamado; Lệch; Bếp nướng/lò xông khói bằng viên gỗ; Propan; Dọc; Dạng nước/Dạng hình viên đạn; Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de defumador: Barril; Armário/caixa; Tambor; Elétrico; Kamado; Offset; Churrasqueira/defumador a pellets; Propano; Vertical; A água/tipo bala; Outro
nb: Røykertype: Tønne; Skap/boks; Tromme; Elektrisk; Kamado; Offset; Pelletgrill/røyker; Propan; Vertikal; Vann/Bullet; Annet
bg-BG: Тип уред за опушване: Цилиндрично; Шкаф/кутия; Тип „барабан“; Електрически; Камадо; Офсет; Грил за пелети/пушилня; Пропан; Вертикално; Пушилня тип „куршум“; Друго
th: ประเภทของอุปกรณ์รมควัน: ทรงบาร์เรล; ตู้/กล่อง; ทรงกระบอก; ไฟฟ้า; คามาโดะ; ออฟเซ็ต; เตาย่าง/เครื่องรมควันชนิดเม็ดไม้; โพรเพน; แนวตั้ง; แบบน้ำ/กระสุน; อื่นๆ
ko: 스모커 유형: 배럴; 캐비닛/박스; 드럼; 전자식; 카마도; 오프셋; 펠릿 그릴/훈제기; 프로페인; 수직; 워터/불릿; 기타
zh-CN: 烟熏炉类型: 桶式; 柜式/箱式; 鼓式; 电动式; 陶瓷; 偏置式; 颗粒烧烤/烟熏; 丙烷式; 立式; 水式/子弹型; 其他
lt-LT: Rūkyklės tipas: Apvali; Spintelė/dėžė; Statinė; Elektrinė; Kamado; Iškili; Granulinė kepsninė / rūkykla; Propanas; Vertikali; Vandens / „Bullet“ tipo; Kita
ja: スモーカーの種類: バレル; キャビネット/ボックス; ドラム; 電気; かまど; オフセット; ペレットグリル/スモーカー; プロパン; 縦向き; 水/スモーキングガン; その他